Utah statutes.
73-10c-1.   Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the conservation, development, treatment, restoration, and protection of the waters of this arid state are a state purpose and a matter of statewide concern. The needs and requirements associated with conserving, developing, treating, restoring, and protecting the waters of this state are of such magnitude and complexity that they justify state participation and assistance. The federal Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 United States Code Annotated Secs. 300f et seq. (federal drinking water act) establishes a national policy to ensure delivery of safe drinking water to the public, establishes maximum pollution levels, monitoring and reporting requirements and provides penalties, including the assessment of fines, for political subdivisions that violate the act. The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Title 33, Chapter 26, United States Code (federal water pollution control act), establishes a national policy and program for the restoration, preservation, and protection of the nation's waters. The political subdivisions of this state are prohibited by the federal water pollution control act from polluting the navigable waters of the United States and are subject to various penalties, including the assessment of fines, for failing to meet the minimum standards of the federal water pollution control act. Pursuant to the requirements of the federal pollution control act, the state has established water quality standards and effluent limitations with respect to the waters of this state.  These standards and limitations have been adopted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for the purpose of issuing permits for wastewater projects and the state must certify compliance with these standards and limitations in order for the federal permit to be obtained.  Under the federal water pollution control act, the state and its political subdivisions may receive grants, subject to the availability of funds, to meet the requirements of the federal water pollution control act if the state or its political subdivisions make contributions to the nonfederal share of construction costs of treatment works. It is desirable that the state assist in providing financing mechanisms to aid political subdivisions in securing needed water treatment and transporting water and in the acquisition and construction of drinking water projects and wastewater projects in order to accomplish the foregoing purposes, to protect the public health and welfare, to meet the anticipated growth in the state and to encourage development of the state's resources.

